Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
12-26-107. Inspection of facility — Report.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each criminal detention facility review committee shall visit and inspect each criminal detention facility and each juvenile detention facility, if any, in the committee's criminal detention facility review committee district at least annually for the purpose of determining the conditions of confinement, the treatment of prisoners, and whether the criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities comply with the minimum standards established pursuant to this chapter.

A written report of each inspection shall be made within thirty (30) days following such inspection to the administrative judge for a judicial district within the geographic area of the criminal detention facility review committee district in which the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility is located and to the county judge or the governing body of the political subdivision whose criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility is the subject of the written report.

The written report shall specify those respects in which the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility does not comply with the required minimum standards.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 153, in (a), substituted “the committee’s criminal detention facility review committee district” for “its judicial district” and substituted “criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities” for “facilities”; rewrote (b)(1); and, in (b)(2), inserted “written” and substituted “criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility” for “facility”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 substituted “criminal detention facilities and juvenile detention facilities” for “facilities” in (a); in (b)(1), substituted “criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility” for “facility” throughout and inserted “written” preceding “report” at the end; and, in (b)(2), inserted “written” and substituted “criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility” for “facility”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, No. 153, § 10: Jan. 1, 2019, except §§7-9, effective Aug. 1, 2017. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 1 through 6 of this act are effective on and after January 1, 2019.”

The governing body shall then initiate appropriate corrective action within six (6) months of the receipt of the inspection report or may voluntarily close the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility or the objectionable portion of the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility.

If the governing body fails to initiate corrective action within six (6) months after receipt of the inspection report, or fails to correct the disclosed conditions, or fails to close the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility or the objectionable portion of the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility, the committee may petition a circuit court within the judicial district in which the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility is located to close the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility.

The petition shall include the inspection report regarding the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility.

The local governing body shall then have thirty (30) days to respond to the petition and shall serve a copy of the response on the chair by certified mail, return receipt requested.

Thereafter, a hearing shall be held on the petition before the circuit court, and an order rendered by the circuit court which:

Dismisses the petition of the committee;

Directs that corrective action be initiated in some form by the local governing body with respect to the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility in question; or

Directs that the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility be closed.

An appeal from the decision of the circuit court may be taken as provided in the Rules of Appellate Procedure — Civil.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by No. 153 deleted “and to the duly constituted grand jury for the county in which the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility is located” from the end of (a)(1); rewrote (a)(2); deleted “or the grand jury, or both” and similar language following “governing body” in (b), (c), (d)(1), and (e)(2); substituted “chair of the criminal detention facility review committee, or the chair's designee” for “committee chair” in (b); substituted “criminal detection facility or juvenile detention facility” for “detention facility” in (c) and made similar changes in (d); substituted “chair” for “committee chair” in (d)(3); inserted “or juvenile detention facility” in (e)(2) and (e)(3); substituted “as provided in the Rules of Appellate Procedure — Civil” for “to the Supreme Court” in (f); and made stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendment by No. 250 substituted “criminal detection facility or juvenile detention facility” for “facility” or “detention facility” throughout (a)(2), (c), and (d); deleted “duly constituted” preceding “grand jury” in (a)(1); in (d)(1), substituted “the inspection” for “such inspection”, “portion of the criminal detention facility or juvenile detention facility” for “portion thereof”, and “may” for “is authorized to”; substituted “the circuit court” for “such court” in the introductory language of (e); inserted “or juvenile detention facility” in (e)(2) and (e)(3); and substituted “as provided in the Arkansas Rules of Appellate Procedure” for “to the Supreme Court” in (f).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning a citizen advisory council, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 153, §8. The section was derived from Acts 2001, No. 1185, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1190, § 1, provided: “Legislative Intent. The purpose of this act is to create a holistic and seamless approach for reentry into society for persons in the custody of the Department of Correction.”

Acts 2013, No. 1190, § 2, provided: “Meetings established.

“(a)The Department of Community Correction is directed to convene joint sessions with the Department of Correction, Arkansas Economic Development Commission, Department of Education, Department of Higher Education, Department of Career Education, Department of Workforce Services, Department of Human Services, Department of Finance and Administration, the Parole Board, the Arkansas Prosecuting Attorneys Association, the Arkansas Public Defender Commission, as well as criminal defense attorneys and any other state, county, or local agency as appropriate to discuss the goals of this act. All invited agencies shall participate.

“(b) The Department of Community Correction also shall involve the private sector by engaging groups such as chambers of commerce, labor unions, faith-based organizations, foundations with an interest in a reentry system, literacy groups, advocates for systemic reentry, and any other private sector groups as appropriate to discuss the goals of this act.”

Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 36, provided:

“USE OF MARKETING AND REDISTRIBUTION PROCEEDS FROM SALE OF STATE PROPERTY. The proceeds from the sale of state property through the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Department of Finance and Administration, may be deposited into the Cash in State Treasury fund in an amount not to exceed $100,000 there to be used for operating expenses for the Paws in Prison program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1933, No. 30, § 37, provided, in part, that laws not inconsistent with, or specifically repealed by, Acts 1933, No. 30 should apply to the Board of Penal Institutions.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 44, provided, in part, that all laws relating to the State Penitentiary which were not specifically repealed by, or in conflict with, Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50 would apply to the Department of Correction.

Acts 1993, No. 958, § 5, provided:

“Effective July 1, 1993, the Board of Parole and Community Rehabilitation created in ACA §16-93-201 et seq. shall assume the name of Post Prison Transfer Board and shall assume the additional duties as defined in Act 530 of 1993.”

Cross References. Emergency procedures to relieve prison overcrowding, §12-28-601 et seq.

United States prisoners, duty to receive, §12-41-510.

Preambles. Acts 1945, No. 13 contained a preamble which read:

“The primary purpose of this act is to abolish the State Penal Building Commission, and to vest in the State Penitentiary Board all powers and duties heretofore vested in the State Penal Building Commission. All books, files and records of the State Penal Building Commission shall be delivered to the State Penitentiary Board….”

Acts 1973, No. 464 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the location of the administrative headquarters of the Department of Correction at Pine Bluff would place the Department of Correction in a better location to serve the needs of the Cummins and Tucker Units, and would also permit the establishment of central warehouses and other facilities to serve the Cummins and Tucker Units and the Women's Reformatory, with resulting economies in the operation thereof;

“Whereas, the General Assembly has authorized the construction of a Women's Reformatory adjacent to the present Boys Training School facilities at Pine Bluff; and

“Whereas, the Board of Correction has recommended that the administrative headquarters of the Department of Correction be moved to the grounds of the new Women's Reformatory facility….”

Effective Dates. Acts 1893, No. 76, § 71: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 482, § 6: Mar. 28, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1933, No. 30, § 38: Feb. 14, 1933. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained that the present method of operating the state penitentiary, penitentiary farms and other state penal institutions, is expensive and cumbersome and that the situation should be remedied as quickly as possible in order to save the taxpayers of Arkansas huge sums of money and to increase the efficiency of the penal institutions, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 46: Mar. 1, 1968. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order better to effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to establish a Department of Correction to effectuate such rehabilitation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after March 1, 1968.”

Acts 1975, No. 733, § 3: Apr. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the Seventieth General Assembly that it is immediately necessary that the Commissioner of Correction be provided with an official seal of office in order to properly perform the assigned functions of his office and properly authenticate documents and records of the Arkansas Department of Correction for use in judicial proceedings. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety and to insure the proper administration of justice shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 935, § 2: Mar. 31, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that there exists a need for greater efficiency in the issuing of warrants for the retaking of persons who escape from the lawful custody of the Department of Correction. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 661, § 3: Mar. 29, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the per diem for the Board of Correction is not sufficient to reimburse citizens for their cost of serving in this vital function, and that an increase is necessary for the continued effective supervision and management of the department, and for the continued orderly operation of state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the effective date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 3: Jan. 25, 1980. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the per diem for the Board of Correction is not sufficient to reimburse citizens for their cost of serving in this vital function, and that an increase is necessary for the continued effective supervision and management of the department, and for the continued orderly operation of state government. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the effective date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 58, § 7: approved Feb. 12, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the penal system of the State of Arkansas is in need of immediate reform, in order to better effectuate the rehabilitation of persons convicted of crimes and to make possible their return as useful members of the community, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to facilitate these reforms. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1981, No. 139, § 2: Feb. 26, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the above mentioned act is severely outdated; that sometimes it is necessary for a prison employee to use certain items with the permission of the director; that the above mentioned act is much too restrictive and hard to enforce. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 648, § 27: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1985 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1985 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985, No. 734, § 3: Mar. 29, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present compensation for Board of Correction members is too low and this act is necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 953, § 31: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 708, § 4: Mar. 20, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the language of the current law relating to the per diem and expenses of the State Board of Correction for attending meetings of the board and other business of the board is in urgent need of clarification; that this act is designed to clarify the same and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 819, § 6: Mar. 21, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly that the Arkansas Department of Correction is to receive $22.5 million from bond proceeds issued by the State of Arkansas through the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and that the purchaser of such bonds require that legislation be enacted authorizing the creation of various accounts in financial institutions outside of the State Treasury. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 118, § 37: July 1, 1989 except §§ 33-37, effective June 23, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1989 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1989 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety Sections 1 through 32 shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1989 and Sections 33 through 37 shall be in full force and effect upon the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 574, § 8: Mar. 15, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under present law persons sentenced to the Department of Correction and awaiting transfer to the department are entitled to earn meritorious goodtime during such wait only if the delay is due to lack of space in the Department of Correction facilities; that it is only fair that those persons be permitted to earn meritorious goodtime while waiting for transfer for whatever reason; that this act is designed to correct this situation and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 644, § 9: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 1078, § 37: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 658, § 3: Mar. 24, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is an urgent need to utilize all existing bed space in the Department of Correction, and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 697, § 8: Mar. 24, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Department of Correction is in need of a non-tax receipt cash fund for immediate deposit of funds to supplement the Department's operation and this act should be given effect immediately in order to provide such relief. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 911, § 38: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, No. 953, § 24: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1993 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1993 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 26, § 5: Aug. 23, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas meeting in the Second Extraordinary Session of 1994 that authority is needed by the Board of Correction and Community Punishment to enable its members to receive per diem for attending to Board business; that the provisions of the act will provide the necessary authority to continue the effective and efficient monitoring of the operations of the Department of Corrections, and that the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, in order to promote effective and efficient administration of government programs, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 158, § 31: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 195, § 9: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 316, § 19: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1995, No. 1170, § 13: Apr. 11, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that confusion exists regarding the status of ineligible offenders judicially transferred to Department of Community Punishment facilities; that there is an immediate need to clarify the law applicable to transferring ineligible offenders back to the Department of Correction; and that it is in the best interest of the courts which already have crowded documents to immediately reduce the reporting requirements for departure sentences. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 324, § 9: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and in its place established the House Interim Committee and Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1031, § 7: Apr. 2, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the ‘Task Force to Study the Disparity in Sentencing for Persons Convicted of Non-violent Crimes’ has found that it appears that some Arkansas citizens do not receive equitable sentences under the law; that it is necessary to compile statistical sentencing information in order to determine if disparities exist; and that this act is immediately necessary to allow the compiling of the needed statistical information in the first quarter of 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 11: Apr. 7, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the need to register sex offenders and update the registration files of sex offenders is necessary to ensure the safety of the citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the provisions of this act will improve the process of registering sex offenders and updating the registration files of sex offenders; and that this act is immediately necessary because of the public risk posed by sex offenders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 1291, § 48: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2007 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2007 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 958, § 2: July 31, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the appointment of capable and qualified people to serve on the Board of Corrections is of vital importance for the proper discharge of the duties imposed on the board; and that a fair system of per diem stipends and expense reimbursement for the Board of Corrections is necessary to keep and attract capable and qualified people to serve and should be implemented as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 895, § 49: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that prison overcrowding is one of the largest problems currently burdening the state both from a public safety and budgetary standpoint; that safe and effective measures are needed to immediately combat this problem; and that this act is immediately necessary because in the interests of public safety and the state budget the Department of Correction, Department of Community Correction, Department of Human Services, and the Parole Board should be allowed to immediately implement these new measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1201, § 2: Oct. 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, No. 1206, § 3: Apr. 7, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a serious prison overcrowding problem in Arkansas; that every alternative housing solution should be considered until the prison population becomes manageable; and that this act is immediately necessary because the corrections agencies need flexibility to immediately address the prison overcrowding problem. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1265, § 12: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is an alarming lack oftransparency in the corrections system regarding information about inmates who will soon be coming up for parole and released into society; that it is vital to public safety that the public know exactly what potential threats exist from inmates in the Department of Correction who will soon be introduced back into society; and that this act is immediately necessary because the sooner inmate, parolee, and probationer information is made available to the public, the sooner the public is able to evaluate who is and who is not a threat to society. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the publicpeace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Criminal Procedure, 16 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 99.
